Wisconsin, session 2026S1, AB1.
do enact as follows:AB1,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (cd) of the statutes is created to read:AB1,2,3220.835 (2) (cd) Surplus refund payments. A sum sufficient to make the 3payments under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 9137 (1).AB1,24Section 2. 38.16 (4) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1,2,6538.16 (4) (c) For the payment in 2027 and annually thereafter, $50,000,000 in 6addition to the amount under par. (b).AB1,37Section 3. 71.05 (6) (b) 60. of the statutes is created to read:AB1,2,12871.05 (6) (b) 60. a. Subject to the limitation under subd. 60. b., for taxable 9years beginning after December 31, 2025, the amount that the claimant may deduct 10under section 224 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes on the 11claimant’s federal income tax return for the taxable year to which the claim under 12this subdivision relates.AB1,3,313b. For an individual who is a part-year resident or nonresident of this state, 14the subtraction under this subdivision for the taxable year may not exceed the 15amount that is calculated by multiplying the amount that the individual may 16deduct under section 224 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes 1on the individual’s federal income tax return by a fraction the numerator of which is 2the individual’s qualified tips that are taxable by this state and the denominator of 3which is the individual’s total qualified tips.AB1,3,84c. Notwithstanding section 224 (h) of the Internal Revenue Code, for taxable 5years beginning after December 31, 2028, a claimant may claim the subtraction 6under this subdivision as if section 224 (h) of the Internal Revenue Code did not 7prohibit the claimant from deducting an amount on the claimant’s federal income 8tax return for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2028.AB1,3,109d. In this subdivision, “qualified tips” has the meaning given in section 224 (d) 10of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes.AB1,411Section 4. 71.05 (6) (b) 61. of the statutes is created to read:AB1,3,161271.05 (6) (b) 61. a. Subject to subd. 61. b. and c., for taxable years beginning 13after December 31, 2025, the amount that the claimant may deduct under section 14225 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes on the claimant’s 15federal income tax return for the taxable year to which the claim under this 16subdivision relates.AB1,3,2317b. For an individual who is a part-year resident or nonresident of this state, 18the subtraction under this subdivision for the taxable year may not exceed the 19amount that is calculated by multiplying the amount that the individual may 20deduct under section 225 of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes 21on the individual’s federal income tax return by a fraction the numerator of which is 22the individual’s qualified overtime compensation that is taxable by this state and 23the denominator of which is the individual’s total qualified overtime compensation.AB1,4,424c. Notwithstanding section 225 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code, for taxable 1years beginning after December 31, 2028, a claimant may claim the subtraction 2under this subdivision as if section 225 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code did not 3prohibit the claimant from deducting an amount on the claimant’s federal income 4tax return for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2028.AB1,4,65d. In this subdivision, “qualified overtime compensation” has the meaning 6given in section 225 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code in effect for federal purposes.AB1,57Section 5. 71.52 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1,5,23871.52 (6) “Income” means the sum of Wisconsin adjusted gross income and 9the following amounts, to the extent not included in Wisconsin adjusted gross 10income: maintenance payments (except foster care maintenance and 11supplementary payments excludable under section 131 of the internal revenue 12code), support money, cash public assistance (not including credit granted under 13this subchapter and amounts under s. 46.27, 2017 stats.), cash benefits paid by 14counties under s. 59.53 (21), the gross amount of any pension or annuity (including 15railroad retirement benefits, all payments received under the federal social security 16act and veterans disability pensions), nontaxable interest received from the federal 17government or any of its instrumentalities, nontaxable interest received on state or 18municipal bonds, worker’s compensation, unemployment insurance, the gross 19amount of “loss of time” insurance, compensation and other cash benefits received 20from the United States for past or present service in the armed forces, scholarship 21and fellowship gifts or income, capital gains, gain on the sale of a personal residence 22excluded under section 121 of the internal revenue code, dividends, income of a 23nonresident or part-year resident who is married to a full-year resident, housing 24allowances provided to members of the clergy, the amount by which a resident 1manager’s rent is reduced, nontaxable income of an American Indian, any amount 2subtracted under s. 71.05 (6) (b) 60. or 61., nontaxable income from sources outside 3this state and nontaxable deferred compensation. Intangible drilling costs, 4depletion allowances and depreciation, including first-year depreciation allowances 5under section 179 of the internal revenue code, amortization, contributions to 6individual retirement accounts under section 219 of the internal revenue code, 7contributions to Keogh plans, net operating loss carry-backs and carry-forwards, 8capital loss carry-forwards, and disqualified losses deducted in determining 9Wisconsin adjusted gross income shall be added to “income”. “Income” does not 10include gifts from natural persons, cash reimbursement payments made under 11title XX of the federal social security act, surplus food or other relief in kind 12supplied by a governmental agency, the gain on the sale of a personal residence 13deferred under section 1034 of the internal revenue code or nonrecognized gain 14from involuntary conversions under section 1033 of the internal revenue code. 15Amounts not included in adjusted gross income but added to “income” under this 16subsection in a previous year and repaid may be subtracted from income for the 17year during which they are repaid. Scholarship and fellowship gifts or income that 18are included in Wisconsin adjusted gross income and that were added to household 19income for purposes of determining the credit under this subchapter in a previous 20year may be subtracted from income for the current year in determining the credit 21under this subchapter. A marital property agreement or unilateral statement 22under ch. 766 has no effect in computing “income” for a person whose homestead is 23not the same as the homestead of that person’s spouse.AB1,624Section 6. 115.437 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1,6,41115.437 (1) In this section, “number of pupils enrolled” has the meaning given 2in s. 121.90 (1) (intro.) and includes 40 percent of the summer enrollment. “Number 3of pupils enrolled” does not include pupils described in the exception under s. 4121.90 (1) (f) (g).AB1,75Section 7. 121.07 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1,6,106121.07 (7) (b) The “secondary guaranteed valuation per member” is an 7amount, rounded to the next lower dollar, that, after subtraction of payments under 8ss. 121.09, 121.105 (5), and 121.85 (6) (b) 2. and 3. and (c), fully distributes an 9amount equal to the amount remaining in the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) 10(ac).AB1,811Section 8. 121.105 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1,6,1212121.105 (title) Special adjustment aids and per pupil state aid.AB1,913Section 9. 121.105 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1,6,1614121.105 (1) In this section, “state aid” means the sum of the payments 15provided to a school district under this section subs. (2) to (4) and ss. 121.08, 121.85, 16and 121.86.AB1,1017Section 10. 121.105 (5) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/my6_ab1 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/my6_ab1 proposaltext/2025/MY6/AB1 proposaltext/2025/MY6/AB1 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»MY6 AB1: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting